Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.250

Gambling property or premises—Common nuisances, abatement—Termination of interests, licenses—Enforcement.

(1) All gambling premises are common nuisances and shall be subject to abatement by injunction or as otherwise provided by law. The plaintiff in any action brought under this subsection against any gambling premises, need not show special injury and may, in the discretion of the court, be relieved of all requirements as to giving security.

(2) When any property or premise held under a mortgage, contract, or leasehold is determined by a court having jurisdiction to be a gambling premises, all rights and interests of the holder therein shall terminate and the owner shall be entitled to immediate possession at his or her election: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That this subsection shall not apply to those premises in which activities authorized by this chapter or any act or acts in furtherance thereof are carried on when conducted in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(3) When any property or premises for which one or more licenses issued by the commission are in effect, is determined by a court having jurisdiction to be a gambling premise, all such licenses may be voided and no longer in effect, and no license so voided shall be issued or reissued for such property or premises for a period of up to sixty days thereafter. Enforcement of this subsection shall be the duty of all peace officers and all taxing and licensing officials of this state and its political subdivisions and other public agencies. This subsection shall not apply to property or premises in which activities authorized by this chapter, or any act or acts in furtherance thereof, are carried on when conducted in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

[ 2011 c 336 s 305; 1987 c 4 s 45; 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 25.]